Nevada, session 83, AB9.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 533.0243 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
533.0243 1. [The Legislature hereby finds and declares that it
is the policy of this State to allow] Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 3, the State Engineer may authorize the temporary
conversion of agricultural water rights for wildlife purposes or to
improve the quality , quantity or flow of water [.] in accordance
with the provisions of this section.
2. If a person or entity proposes to temporarily convert
agricultural water rights [for wildlife purposes or to improve the
quality or flow of water,] pursuant to this section, such temporary
conversion:
(a) Must not be carried out unless the person or entity first
applies for and receives from the State Engineer any necessary
permits or approvals required pursuant to:
(1) The provisions of this chapter; and
(2) Any applicable decisions, orders, procedures and
regulations of the State Engineer.
(b) [Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, must] Must
not exceed [3] 5 years in duration [. A temporary conversion of
agricultural water rights for wildlife purposes or to improve the
quality or flow of water] and may be extended in increments not to
exceed [3] 5 years in duration each, provided that the person or
entity seeking the extension first applies for and receives from the
State Engineer any necessary permits or approvals, as described in
paragraph (a).
3. The State Engineer:
(a) May deny an application to temporarily convert an
agricultural water right received pursuant to subsection 2 or limit
the temporary conversion or extension of the temporary
conversion to any duration of less than 5 years if the State
Engineer determines that the temporary conversion or duration of
the temporary conversion would not meet the purposes set forth in
subsection 1 or would not otherwise be in the public interest; and
(b) Shall not approve an application to temporarily convert an
agricultural water right if the water right is a groundwater right
and the owner has received notice from the State Engineer
-
*AB9_R1*

– 3 –
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 534.090 indicating 4 or more
consecutive years of nonuse.
4. If the State Engineer authorizes the temporary conversion
of an agricultural water right pursuant to this section, the
temporarily converted water right:
(a) Must not be considered a beneficial use for the purpose of
perfecting the water right or proving that beneficial use of the
water right has resumed;
(b) Must not be claimed or considered a consumptive use for
the purposes of NRS 533.3703;
(c) Remains subject to the provisions of NRS 534.037 and any
groundwater management plan or modification thereto; and
(d) Remains subject to any order of the State Engineer
requiring that withdrawals be restricted to conform to priority
rights.
5. Upon the expiration of the temporary conversion and any
extension granted pursuant to subsection 2, an agricultural water
right that is temporarily converted must revert to the existing
beneficial use of the agricultural water right before the water right
was temporarily converted.
Sec. 2. NRS 534.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
failure for 5 successive years after April 15, 1967, on the part of the
holder of any right, whether it is an adjudicated right, an
unadjudicated right or a right for which a certificate has been issued
pursuant to NRS 533.425, and further whether the right is initiated
after or before March 25, 1939, to use beneficially all or any part of
the underground water for the purpose for which the right is
acquired or claimed, works a forfeiture of both undetermined rights
and determined rights to the use of that water to the extent of the
nonuse.
2. If the records of the State Engineer or any other documents
obtained by or provided to the State Engineer indicate 4 or more
consecutive years of nonuse of all or any part of a water right which
is governed by this chapter:
(a) The State Engineer shall notify the owner of the water right,
as determined in the records of the Office of the State Engineer, by
registered or certified mail of the nonuse and that the owner has 1
year after the date of the notice of nonuse in which to use the water
right beneficially and to provide proof of such use to the State
Engineer or apply for relief pursuant to subsection 3 to avoid
forfeiting the water right.
(b) If, after 1 year after the date of the notice of nonuse pursuant
to paragraph (a), proof of resumption of beneficial use is not filed in
the Office of the State Engineer, the State Engineer shall, unless the
-
*AB9_R1*

– 4 –
State Engineer has granted a request to extend the time necessary to
work a forfeiture of the water right, send a final notice to the owner
of the water right, as determined in the records of the Office of the
State Engineer, by registered or certified mail, that the water right is
held for forfeiture. If the owner of the water right, within 30 days
after the date of such final notice, fails to file the required proof of
resumption of beneficial use or an application for an extension of
time to prevent forfeiture, the State Engineer shall declare the right,
or the portion of the right not returned to beneficial use, forfeited.
The State Engineer shall send notice of the declaration of forfeiture,
by registered or certified mail, to the owner of record, as determined
in the records of the Office of the State Engineer, of the water right
that has been declared forfeited.
(c) If, after receipt of a notice of the declaration of forfeiture
pursuant to paragraph (b), the owner of record of the water right
fails to appeal the ruling in the manner provided for in NRS
533.450, and within the time provided for therein, the forfeiture
becomes final. Upon the forfeiture of the water right, the water
reverts to the public and is available for further appropriation,
subject to existing rights.
3. The State Engineer may, upon the request of the holder of
any right described in subsection 1, extend the time necessary to
work a forfeiture under subsection 2 if the request is made before
the expiration of the time necessary to work a forfeiture. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 4, the State Engineer may grant,
upon request and for good cause shown, any number of extensions,
but a single extension must not exceed 1 year. In determining
whether to grant or deny a request, the State Engineer shall, among
other reasons, consider:
(a) Whether the holder has submitted proof and evidence that
the holder is proceeding in good faith and with reasonable diligence
to resume use of the water beneficially for the purpose for which the
holder’s right is acquired or claimed;
(b) The number of years during which the water has not been
put to the beneficial use for which the right is acquired or claimed;
(c) Any economic conditions or natural disasters which made
the holder unable to put the water to that use;
(d) Whether the water right is located in a basin within a county
under a declaration of drought by the Governor, United States
Secretary of Agriculture or the President of the United States;
(e) Whether the holder has demonstrated efforts to conserve
water which have resulted in a reduction in water consumption;
(f) Whether the water right is located in a basin that has been
designated as a critical management area by the State Engineer
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 534.110;
-
*AB9_R1*

– 5 –
(g) The date of priority of the water right as it relates to the
potential curtailment of water use in the basin;
(h) The availability of water in the basin, including, without
limitation, whether withdrawals of water consistently exceed the
perennial yield of the basin; and
(i) Any orders restricting use or appropriation of water in the
basin.
 The State Engineer shall notify, by registered or certified mail,
the owner of the water right, as determined in the records of the
Office of the State Engineer, of whether the State Engineer has
granted or denied the holder’s request for an extension pursuant to
this subsection. If the State Engineer grants an extension pursuant to
this subsection and, before the expiration of that extension, proof of
resumption of beneficial use or another request for an extension is
not filed in the Office of the State Engineer, the State Engineer shall
send a final notice to the owner of the water right, by registered or
certified mail, that the water right will be declared forfeited if the
owner of the water right fails to file the required proof of
resumption of beneficial use or an application for an extension of
time to prevent forfeiture within 30 days after the date of the final
notice. If the owner of the water right fails to file the required proof
of resumption of beneficial use or an application for an extension of
time to prevent forfeiture within 30 days after the date of such final
notice, the State Engineer shall declare the water right, or the
portion of the right not returned to beneficial use, forfeited.
4. If the State Engineer grants an extension pursuant to
subsection 1 in a basin:
(a) Where withdrawals of groundwater consistently exceed the
perennial yield of the basin; or
(b) That has been designated as a critical management area by
the State Engineer pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 534.110,
 a single extension must not exceed 3 years, but any number of
extensions may be granted to the holder of such a right.
5. The failure to receive a notice pursuant to subsection 2 or 3
does not nullify the forfeiture or extend the time necessary to work
the forfeiture of a water right.
6. A right to use underground water whether it is vested or
otherwise may be lost by abandonment. If the State Engineer, in
investigating a groundwater source, upon which there has been a
prior right, for the purpose of acting upon an application to
appropriate water from the same source, is of the belief from his or
her examination that an abandonment has taken place, the State
Engineer shall so state in the ruling approving the application. If,
upon notice by registered or certified mail to the owner of record
who had the prior right, the owner of record of the prior right fails to
-
*AB9_R1*

– 6 –
appeal the ruling in the manner provided for in NRS 533.450, and
within the time provided for therein, the alleged abandonment
declaration as set forth by the State Engineer becomes final.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a water right
which is subject to:
(a) A contract or agreement entered into in accordance with
an official federal program for the conservation of land or water;
or
(b) An official program for the conservation of water that is
administered by an agency of this State.
H
-
*AB9_R1*